Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislative Ethics

6.601.
Short title for KRS 6.601 to 6.849.

KRS

6.601

to

6.849

may be cited as the “Kentucky Code of Legislative Ethics.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 1, effective September 16, 1993.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since Chapter 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), contained an emergency clause [§ 92] it became effective as a whole when the Governor tendered the bill, which he had signed, to the Secretary of State on February 18, 1993. However, section 87 (13) of Ch. 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.) provided that, except as provided in §§ 88, 89, and 90, §§ 1-84 of the Act should become effective two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the Act, September 16, 1993; other subsections within § 87 establish a transition schedule with other specific dates calculated from the effective date of the Act. Such schedule is actually a listing of deadlines within which certain actions called for in § 87 of the Act are to be completed. Such schedule is as follows: “within 45 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 5, 1993; “within 60 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 19, 1993; “within 75 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 4, 1993; “within 90 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 19, 1993; “within 150 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before July 19, 1993; “within 180 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before August 17, 1993; “two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the act” = September 16, 1993.

OAG 93-25

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

Herrington, Executive Branch Ethics Commission Advisory Opinion 94-4 and Lobbying Registration Requirements Applicable to Attorneys, Vol. 59, No. 1, Winter 1995, Ky. Bench & Bar 22.

6.605.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

6.606.
Purpose of code.

The proper operation of democratic government requires that a public official be independent and impartial; that government policy and decisions be made through the established processes of government; that a public official not use public office to obtain private benefits; that a public official avoid action which creates the appearance of using public office to obtain a benefit; and that the public have confidence in the integrity of its government and public officials.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 2, effective September 16, 1993.

6.610.
Lobbying by legislator — Prohibition. [Repealed.]

6.611.
Definitions for code.

As used in this code, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Adversarial proceeding” means a proceeding in which decisions are made based upon evidence presented as measured against established standards, with parties having the right to appeal the decision on the record to a court;

“Anything of value” includes the following:

A pecuniary item, including money, or a bank bill or note;

A promissory note, bill of exchange, order, draft, warrant, check, or bond given for the payment of money;

A contract, agreement, promise, or other obligation for an advance, conveyance, forgiveness of indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge, or transfer of money;

A stock, bond, note, or other investment interest in an entity;

A receipt given for the payment of money or other property;

A right in action;

A gift, tangible good, chattel, or an interest in a gift, tangible good, or chattel;

A loan or forgiveness of indebtedness;

A work of art, antique, or collectible;

An automobile or other means of personal transportation;

Real property or an interest in real property, including title to realty; a fee simple or partial interest, present or future, contingent or vested, within realty; a leasehold interest; or other beneficial interest in realty;

A rebate or discount in the price of anything of value unless the rebate or discount is made in the ordinary course of business to a member of the public without regard to that person’s status as a legislator;

A promise or offer of employment; or

Any other thing of value that is pecuniary or compensatory in value to a person, or the primary significance of which is economic gain.

“Anything of value” does not include:

A campaign contribution properly received and reported, if reportable, as required under KRS Chapter 121;

Compensation, food, beverages, entertainment, transportation, lodging, or other goods or services extended to a legislator by the legislator’s private employer or by a person other than a legislative agent or employer;

A usual and customary commercial loan made in the ordinary course of business, without regard to the recipient’s status as a legislator, and by a person or institution authorized by law to engage in the business of making loans;

A certificate, plaque, or commemorative token of less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) value;

Promotional items of less than fifty dollars ($50);

Educational items;

Informational items;

The cost of attendance or participation, and of food and beverages consumed, at events:

To which all members of the Kentucky Senate or the Kentucky House of Representatives, or both, are invited;

To which all members of a joint committee or task force of the Kentucky Senate and the Kentucky House of Representatives are invited;

To which a caucus of legislators approved as a caucus by the Legislative Research Commission is invited;

Sponsored or coordinated by a state or local government entity, including a state institution of higher education, provided that the cost thereof is covered by the state or local government entity or state institution of higher education; or

To which an individual legislator is invited that are held in-state, and for which the legislator receives prior approval from a majority of the Legislative Research Commission;

Gifts from a person related by blood or marriage or a member of the legislator’s household;

A gift that:

Is not used; and

No later than thirty (30) days after receipt, is returned to the donor or delivered to a charitable organization and is not claimed as a charitable contribution for federal income tax purposes;

The cost, paid, reimbursed, raised, or obtained by the Legislative Research Commission, for attendance or participation, and for food and beverages consumed at, and funds, goods, and services provided for conducting events sponsored or coordinated by multistate or national organizations of, or including, state governments, state legislatures, or state legislators if the attendance and expenditures are approved in advance by the Legislative Research Commission;

The cost of attendance or participation provided by the sponsoring entity, of lodging, and of food and beverages consumed, at in-state events sponsored by or in conjunction with a civic, charitable, governmental, trade association, or community organization;

A gift or gifts from one member of the General Assembly to another member of the General Assembly;

Anything for which the recipient pays or gives full value; or

Any service spontaneously extended to a legislator in an emergency situation;

“Associated,” if used with reference to an organization, includes an organization in which an individual or a member of the individual’s family is a director, officer, fiduciary, trustee, agent, or partner, or owns or controls, in the aggregate, an interest of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, or an interest of five percent (5%) or more of the outstanding equity;

“Business” means any corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, self-employed individual, holding company, joint stock company, receivership, trust, professional service corporation, or any legal entity through which business is conducted for profit;

“Business associate” includes the following:

A private employer;

A general or limited partnership, or a general or limited partner within the partnership;

A corporation that is family-owned or in which all shares of stock are closely held, and the shareholders, owners, and officers of such a corporation;

A corporation in which the legislator or other person subject to this code has an investment interest, owns, or has a beneficial interest in shares of stock which constitute more than:

Five percent (5%) of the value of the corporation; or

Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) at fair market value;

A corporation, business association, or other business entity in which the legislator or other person subject to this code serves as an agent or a compensated representative;

“Candidate” means an individual who seeks nomination or election to the General Assembly. An individual is a candidate when the individual:

Files a notification and declaration for nomination for office with the Secretary of State; or

Is nominated for office by his or her party under KRS

118.105

,

118.115

,

118.325

, or

118.760

;

“Charitable organization” means an organization described in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 170(c) as it currently exists or as it may be amended;

“Child” means the unemancipated minor daughter, son, stepdaughter, or stepson;

“Commission” means the Kentucky Legislative Ethics Commission;

“Compensation” means:

An advance, salary, conveyance, forgiveness of indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge, or transfer of money; or

A contract, agreement, promise, or other obligation for an advance, conveyance, forgiveness of indebtedness, deposit, distribution, loan, payment, gift, pledge, or transfer of money for services rendered or to be rendered.

“Compensation” does not include reimbursement of expenses if:

The reimbursement is equal to, or less than, the amount paid for the expenses;

Expense records are itemized; and

No portion of the reimbursed expense is used to give anything of value to a legislator, candidate, or the spouse of a legislator or candidate;

“Economic interest” means an interest distinct from that of the general public in a state purchase, sale, lease, contract, option, or other transaction or arrangement involving property or services in which a legislator may gain an economic benefit of fifty dollars ($50) or more;

“Employer” means any person who engages a legislative agent and in the case of a business other than a sole proprietorship or self-employed individual, it means the business entity, and not an individual officer, director, or employee thereof, except when an officer, director, or employee makes an expenditure for which he or she is reimbursed by the business entity;

“Engage” means to make any arrangement, and “engagement” means any arrangement, by which an individual is employed or retained for compensation to act for or on behalf of an employer to lobby;

“Ethical misconduct” means any violation of the Kentucky Code of Legislative Ethics;

“Expenditure” means any of the following that is made to, at the request of, for the benefit of, or on behalf of any member of the General Assembly, the Governor, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, or any member of the staff of any of those officials:

A payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, reimbursement, or gift of money, real estate, or anything of value, including, but not limited to, food and beverages, entertainment, lodging, transportation, or honoraria;

A contract, promise, or agreement, to make an expenditure; or

The purchase, sale, or gift of services or any other thing of value.

“Expenditure” does not include a contribution, gift, or grant to a foundation or other charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. “Expenditure” does not include the purchase, sale, or gift of services or any other thing of value that is available to the general public on the same terms as it is available to the persons listed in this subsection;

“Family member” means a person:

Who is the spouse, parent, sibling, child, mother-in-law, father-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, grandparent, or grandchild of an individual; or

Who is a member of the individual’s household, and is dependent upon the individual;

“Filer” means an individual who is required to file a statement of financial interests pursuant to KRS

6.781

;

“Financial transaction” means a transaction or activity that is conducted or undertaken for profit and arises from the joint ownership, ownership, or part ownership in common of any real or personal property or any commercial or business enterprise of whatever form or nature between the following:

A legislative agent, his or her employer, or a member of the immediate family of the legislative agent or his or her employer; and

Any member of the General Assembly, the Governor, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, or any member of the staff of any of the officials listed in this subparagraph.

“Financial transaction” does not include any transaction or activity:

Described in paragraph (a) of this subsection if it is available to the general public on the same or similar terms and conditions; or

Made or let after public notice and competitive bidding or contracts that are available on similar terms to other members of the general public;

“Former legislator” means a person who previously held a position as a legislator and who no longer holds that position;

“Immediate family” means an unemancipated child residing in an individual’s household, a spouse of an individual, or a person claimed by the individual as a dependent for tax purposes;

“In-state” means within the borders of Kentucky or outside Kentucky in a county that is contiguous with the border of Kentucky;

“Legislation” means bills, resolutions, amendments, nominations, administrative regulations, and any other matter pending before the General Assembly or any of its interim or statutory committees, or the executive approval or veto of any bill acted upon by the General Assembly;

“Legislative agent” means any individual who is engaged:

during at least a portion of his or her time to lobby as one (1) of his or her official responsibilities; or

In lobbying activities as a legislative liaison of an association, coalition, or public interest entity formed for the purpose of promoting or otherwise influencing legislation.

“Legislative agent” does not include:

Any person who limits his or her lobbying activities to appearing before public meetings of legislative committees, subcommittees, or task forces, or public hearings or meetings of public agencies;

A private citizen who receives no compensation for lobbying and who expresses a personal opinion; or

A public servant acting in his or her fiduciary capacity as a representative of his or her agency, college, university, or city, county, urban-county, consolidated local government, unified local government, or charter county government, except persons engaged by a de jure municipal corporation, such as the Kentucky Lottery Corporation or the Kentucky Housing Corporation, institutions of higher education, or local governments, whose primary responsibility during sessions of the General Assembly is to lobby;

“Legislative interest” means a substantial economic interest, distinct from that of the general public, in one (1) or more legislative matters;

“Legislative matter” means any bill, resolution, nomination, or other issue or proposal pending before the General Assembly or any interim committee, committee, subcommittee, task force, or commission of the General Assembly;

“Legislator” means a member or member-elect of the General Assembly;

“Lobby” means to promote, advocate, or oppose the passage, modification, defeat, or executive approval or veto of any legislation by direct communication with any member of the General Assembly, the Governor, the secretary of any cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, or any member of the staff of any of the officials listed in this paragraph.

“Lobbying” does not include:

Appearances before public meetings of the committees, subcommittees, task forces, and interim committees of the General Assembly;

News, editorial, and advertising statements published in newspapers, journals, or magazines, or broadcast over radio or television;

The gathering and furnishing of information and news by bona fide reporters, correspondents, or news bureaus to news media described in paragraph (b)2. of this subsection;

Publications primarily designed for, and distributed to, members of bona fide associations or charitable or fraternal nonprofit corporations;

Professional services in drafting bills or resolutions, preparing arguments on these bills or resolutions, or in advising clients and rendering opinions as to the construction and the effect of proposed or pending legislation, if the services are not otherwise connected with lobbying; or

The action of any person not engaged by an employer who has a direct interest in legislation, if the person, acting under Section 1 of the Kentucky Constitution, assembles together with other persons for their common good, petitions any official listed in this subsection for the redress of grievances, or other proper purposes;

“Person” means an individual, proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, joint stock company, syndicate, business, trust, estate, company, corporation, association, club, committee, organization, or group of persons acting in concert;

“Public servant” means an elected or appointed officer or employee of a federal or state agency; state institution of higher education; or a city, county, urban-county, or charter county government;

“State agency” means any department, office, commission, board, or authority within the executive department, and includes state-supported universities and colleges but does not include local boards of education; and

“Through others” means a scheme, artifice, or mechanism, the sole purpose of which is to accomplish by indirect means, using third parties, results which would be unlawful under this code if accomplished directly between a legislator or candidate and another person or entity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 262, § 1; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 4, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 479, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 211, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 105, § 13, effective March 16, 2005; 2014, ch. 75, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

6.615.
Lobbying by person with whom legislator maintains close economic association — Disclosure. [Repealed.]

6.616.
Definitions of “intentionally” and “knowingly”.

The following definitions apply in this code:

“Intentionally” — A person acts intentionally with respect to a result or to conduct described by a statute defining an offense when his conscious objective is to cause that result or to engage in that conduct.

“Knowingly” — A person acts knowingly with respect to conduct or to a circumstance described by a statute defining an offense when he is aware that his conduct is of that nature or that the circumstance exists.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 5, effective September 16, 1993.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

6.620.
Acceptance of compensation. [Repealed.]

6.621.
Extraterritorial application.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person may be convicted under this code of an offense committed by his own conduct or the conduct of another for which he is legally accountable when:

Either the conduct or the result which is an element of the offense occurs within this state;

Conduct occurring outside the state is sufficient to constitute an attempt to commit an offense within the state;

Conduct occurring outside the state is sufficient to constitute a conspiracy to commit an offense within the state and an overt act in furtherance of the conspiracy occurs within the state;

Conduct occurring within this state establishes complicity in the commission of, or an attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit, an offense in another jurisdiction which is also an offense under this code;

The offense consists of the omission to perform a legal duty imposed by this code regardless of where that person is when the omission occurs; or

The offense is a violation of this code that expressly prohibits conduct outside the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 3, effective September 16, 1993.

6.625.
Acceptance of compensation from private sources. [Repealed.]

6.626.
Construction of code with respect to charitable solicitations, employment of spouses of legislators, and continuing employment as legislative agents of certain spouses of legislators.

Nothing in this code shall preclude:

A legislator or candidate from soliciting contributions on behalf of charitable, civic, or educational entities provided the solicitations are broad-based and are not directed solely or primarily at legislative agents;

A legislator’s spouse from being employed in some other capacity than a legislative agent by the employer of a legislative agent; or

A legislator’s spouse who was employed as a registered lobbyist on February 16, 1993, from continuing to be employed as a legislative agent with the same employer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 70, effective September 16, 1993.

6.630.
Solicitation or acceptance of gratuities — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

6.631.
Construction of code with respect to criminal or penal laws.

Nothing in this code is intended to nor is to be construed as repealing or modifying in any way the provisions of any of the criminal or penal laws of this state but shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 262, § 16; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 83, effective September 16, 1993.

6.632.
Misdemeanor or felony violation of KRS 6.601 to 6.849 may be adjudicated as ethical misconduct.

If a provision of KRS

6.601

to

6.849

is designated as a misdemeanor or a felony, an alleged violation of the provision may be adjudicated by the commission as ethical misconduct.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

6.635.
Acceptance of economic opportunity when intent is to influence legislator’s conduct — Prohibition. [Repealed.]

6.640.
Excessive compensatory charges to persons with legislative interest prohibited. [Repealed.]

6.645.
Disclosure of confidential information — Prohibition. [Repealed.]

6.650.
Unethical conduct — Prohibition. [Repealed.]